dictsource/de_rules
// ***************************************************************************
// *   Copyright (C) 2006 to 2010 by Jonathan Duddington                     *
// *   email: jonsd@users.sourceforge.net                                    *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
// *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
// *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
// *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
// *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
// *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
// *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
// *   along with this program; if not, write see:                           *
// *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
// ***************************************************************************/

.L01 l r
.L02 c f h k p q s t z // unvoiced, except s+vowel
.L03 a ä
.L04 o ö

// Hours
.L05 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 00 01 02 03 04 05 06 07 08 09 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23

// Minutes
.L06 0 1 2 3 4 5

// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// Normalize Unicode Latin-1 Supplement.
// Languages such as PT, ES, FR, DE etc.
// www.unicode.org/charts/PDF/U0080.pdf
// www.unicode.org/charts/PDF/U0300.pdf
.replace
//common german letters:
ä	ä	// a + U+0308 = U+00E4
ö	ö	// o + U+0308 = U+00F6
ü	ü	// u + U+0308 = U+00FC
//non-common letters:
ï	ï	// i + U+0308 = U+00EF
ë	ë	// e + U+0308 = U+00EB
à	à	// a + U+0300 = U+00E0
è	è	// e + U+0300 = U+00E8
ì	ì	// i + U+0300 = U+00EC
ò	ò	// o + U+0300 = U+00F2
ù	ù	// u + U+0300 = U+00F9
á	á	// a + U+0301 = U+00E1
é	é	// e + U+0301 = U+00E9
í	í	// i + U+0301 = U+00ED
ó	ó	// o + U+0301 = U+00F3
ú	ú	// u + U+0301 = U+00FA
â	â	// a + U+0302 = U+00E2
ê	ê	// e + U+0302 = U+00EA
î	î	// i + U+0302 = U+00EE
ô	ô	// o + U+0302 = U+00F4
û	û	// u + U+0302 = U+00FB
ç	ç	// c + U+0327 = U+00E7
ã	ã	// a + U+0303 = U+00E3
õ	õ	// o + U+0303 = U+00F5
å	å	// a + U+030A = U+00E5
ñ	ñ	// n + U+0303 = U+00F1
ý	ý	// y + U+0301 = U+00FD
ÿ	ÿ	// y + U+0308 = U+00FF

.group a
     _) a (_       A:
        a          A
        aa         A:
        ah (+      A:
        ael        A:El
        ae         E:
        ae (CC     E

        a (C%      a
        a (CC      a
        a (sch     a
        a (x       a
        a (ph      A:
   &CC) a (_       =A:

        ai         aI
        ay         aI
        au         aU
        auh (_     aU
        auer	aU@r
    mold) auisch	aUIS

        ab (t_     A:p
        ag (t_     A:k

     _) ab (C@P2   _!'ap
     _) ab (äP2    _!'ap
     _) ab (C@P2   _!'ap
     _) ab (nor    %ap
     _) ab (or     ap_|
     _) ab (sor    %ap
     _) ab (str    %ap
     _) ab (sur    %ap
     _) abb (a     %ab
     _) abb (rev   ab
     _) abd (+     apd
     _) aben (d    A:b@n
     _) aberr      ab_|Er
     _) ab (er@P2  'ap
     _) ab (i      ap
     _) ab (j      ap
     _) ab (se     ap
     _) ab (so     %ap
     _) ab (sz     ap
     _) abzu (@P4  'aptsu:
     _) ac (et     ats
     _) ad (ju     at
        afgh	afg
     _) an (@P2    'an
     _) an (a      %an
     _) a (natioP1 'A:
     _) anath      anat
     _) an (der    an
     _) angli (C   aNgli:
     _) anglo (@   ,aNglo:
     _) anheim (C@P6 anh'aIm
     _) animal     ,ani:mA:l
     _) anim       ,ani:m
     _) ani (s     %ani:
        a (Co_     'A:
     _) ann        an
     _) an (nadP2  'an
     _) an (nL03hP2 'an
     _) anti (@P4  ,antI
     _) an (tw     an
        apo (thek	apo:
    emp) athisch	A:tIS
     _) auf (@P3   _!'aUf
     _) aus (@P3   _!'aUs
     _) aus (ku    aUs

        a (_       A:
        a (C_      A:
     @) a (bl_     'A:
     @) a (bel_    'A:
     s) a (g       A:
    @l) a (g       A:
  schl) ag (ge     A:k
   scl) a (g       A:
   spr) a (ch      A:
     s) a (m_      A:
     s) a (mkeit   A:
    gr) a (mm_     'a
        a (isier   a
     _) achs (@P4  'aks
     _) achs (el   'aks
     j) ag (d      A:k
        age (_$w_alt  'A:Z@
        age (n_$p_alt  'A:Z@
     _) air        _^_EN
     m) air (_     aI3
        ai (sch    A:I
    tr) ain        En
        air (_     E:r
        akqu       %akv
    @A) al (_   'A:l
     b) al   (_  'A:l
     g) al   (_  'A:l
     k) al    (_ 'A:l
     n) al   (_  'A:l
     r) al   (_  'A:l
     t) al   (_  'A:l
     _) aller (@P5 'al@r
     m) a (lt_     A:l
   ker) am (ik     'A:m
     @) an (_      'A:n
     s) ance (_    'A~s
     s) ancen (_   'A~s@n
    fr) ance (_    'A~s@
   ein) an (der    'an
     @) ant (_     'ant
     _) anthropo   ,antro:p%o:
     _) anti (@P4  ,anti:
        anier (_N  'A:ni:3
     _) an (ten    an
     _) an (th     an
     _) appe (ll@  ,apE
     _) archa (i   %arCA
        arier (_N  'A:ri:3
    @l) ar (_      'A:r
    @t) ar (_      'A:r
        a (rch_    'A:
     @) at (_      'A:t
     @) atisch (_S6 'A:tIS
     @) atisieren (_S9 A:ti:z'i:r@n
        a (tion    a
     _) ato (m     %ato:
     _) au (Ceinand aU
     _) aufent     aUf@nt
        austra (l  %aUstrA
     _) authen     aUtEn
        ay (_N     EI
     m) ayr (_     aI3
r     p) ay         EI


.group b
     _) b (_       be:
     _) b (L01A    b  // allow bl br  at start of word
     _) b (jA      b  // allow bj
        b          b
     b) b 
        b (_N      p
        b (L02     p
        b (sA      b
        bt (_N     pt

     _) be (@P2    b@
  &Cen) be (C@     b@
  ungs) be (C@     b@
     _) b (eHC     b
     _) be (C%     bE
     _) bei        b'aI
     _) beige (_   be:S
     _) beige (@   baIg@
     _) be (inhP2  b@
        bet (_	b'e:t

     _) ba (lA     b%a
     _) ba (ll@    b%a
     &) bar (_S3   bA:r
     &) bare (_S4  bA:r@
     &) barem (_S5 bA:r@m
     &) baren (_S5 bA:r@n
     &) barer (_S5 bA:r3
     &) bares (_S5 bA:r@s
        be (ding  b@
     _) b (ebC     b
     _) b (ecC     b
     _) b (eet     b
     _) b (enzin   b
     _) b (erC     b
        be (recht  b@
        be (reich  b@
        be (richt	b@
        be (tracht	b@
     _) b (esen    b
     _) b (ess     b
     _) b (esten   b
        bestem	bEst@m
        bestia     bEsti:'A:
     _) b (eug     b
     _) b (eul     b
     _) b (eut     b

    _o) b (C       p
        baby       _^_EN
        bela (rus	%bEl%a
        bergisch	bErgIS
        beten      be:t@n
        bestimm	%b@StIm
     _) bike       _^_EN
        binde	bInd@ // for compound words, EG. Bindestrich
     _) bis (hP3   b%Is
        blend	blEnd
     _) blue       _^_EN
        board      _^_EN
     _) boom       _^_EN
        bo (sh     bo:
        buchstab	bu:xStA:b
     _) bundes     b'Und@s
        bücher	by:C3r


.group c
     _) c (_       tse:
     _) c (L01A    k  // allow cl cr  at start of word
        c          k
     c) c 
        ck         k

     _) c (el      ts
    fa) c (et      ts
     _) cey        tsaI
        chef (_    SEf
     _) c (ent     s
        c (ie      s
   pla) c (ie      ts
        coat (_    _^_EN
     _) code       ko:t
     _) computer(@P   kOmpj'u:t3
     _) cow        _^_EN
        crew       _^_EN
        cup        _^_EN
        c (y       s
     _) cyber      saIb3


.group ch
     _) ch (L01A   k
     _) ch (a      S
     _) ch (A      C
     _) ch (o      k
        ch         C
     a) ch         x
     o) ch         x
     u) ch         x
    fu) ch (s      k
    äu) ch         C
    eu) ch         C
     C) chen (_S4  C@n
     ä) chen (_    C@n
     e) chen (_    C@n
     ü) chen (_    C@n

        chs        ks
     ei) chs (_	Cs
        chance     SA~s@
        chara (kt  k%ara
     _) ch (ic     S
     _) ch (if     S
     _) ch (il     S
        chip (_    tSIp      // English

   bre) ch (en     x
        ch (ord    k
        ch (or_    k
        ch (ör     k
        chro       kro:
    nä) chs (t     Cs
    wa) chstu (m   kstu:


.group d
     _) d (_       de:
     _) d (rA      d  // allow dr at start of word
     _) d (schA    d
     _) d (shA     d
        d          d
     d) d 
        d (_N      t
        d (L02     t
        d (sA      d
        ds (_      ts
     _) dsch	dZ
        dt         t
        ddt        t
  soun) d          d

     _) dabei (P5  dA:'baI
     _) dafür (P5  dA:f'y:r
     _) daher (P5  dA:h'Er
     _) dahin (P5  dA:h'In
     _) dahinter (P8 dA:h'Int3
     _) daneben (P7 dA:n'e:b@n
     _) daran (P5  dA:r'an
     _) darauf (P6 dA:r'aUf
     _) daraus (P6 dA:r'aUs
     _) darein (P6  dA:r'aIn
     _) darin (P5  dA:r'In
     _) darüber (P7 dA:r'y:b@r
     _) darum (P5  dA:r'Um
     _) darunter (P8 dA:r'Unt@r
     _) davon (P5  dA:f'On
     _) davor (P5  dA:f'o:r
     _) dazu (P4   dA:ts'u:

     _) daten (@P5 d'A:t@n
     _) deal       _^_EN
     _) de (if     de:
     _) de (ikP2   d%e:
     _) de (instaP2 d%e:
     _) deme       de:mE
  trotz) dem       de:m
        demo (g    de:mo:
        demo (k    de:mo:
        design (_  d%IzaIn
        dge (_     _^_EN
     _) dia        d,i:a
     _) diver      d%i:vEr
     _) dort (C@P4 d'Ort
        drive      _^_EN
     _) drug       _^_EN
     _) durch (@P5 d'UrC
     _) durch (b   d%UrC
     _) durch (f   d%UrC
     _) durch (kr  d%UrC
     _) durch (la  d%UrC
     _) durchque   d%UrCkve:
     _) durch (schau d%UrC
     _) durch (st  d%UrC
     _) durch (su  d%UrC
     _) durch (tre d%UrC
     _) durch (w   d%UrC
     _) durch (wachP5 d'UrC
     _) durchweg   dUrCve:k


.group e
     _) e (_       e:
        e          e:
     &) eau (_	'o:
        ee         e:
        eh (+      e:

        e (C%      E
        e (CC      E
        e (sch     E
        e (x       E
        e (ph      e:

        ei         aI
        
        eu         OY
        ey         aI
   prot) ei (n	e:'i:
        eb (t_     e:p
        eg (t_     e:k
        eth	e:t

        een (_     'e:@n
        ell (_     'El
    ll) e (l       e:
     &) e (_S1     @
    @t) e (_S1     @
     &) e (BB_     E2
        e (gt_+    e:
     @) e (kt_     'E
    @@) e (kt_     E
     &) el (_      @l
     &) eln (_NS1  n
     &) elnd (_    @lnd
     &) e (lt_     @
     &) em (_NS2   @m
     &) em (_      'e:m
     _) end (C@P3  'Ent
     _) endo (@    ,Endo:
     @) en (_S2    @n
     &) end (_NS3  @nt
     &) ende (_S4  @nd@
     &) endem (_S5 @nd@m
     &) enden (_S5 @nd@n
     &) ender (_S5 @nd3
     &) endes (_S5 @nd@s
     &) end (_     @nd
   ier) end (_NS3  @nt
   ier) end (_     @nd
     @) enhaft (_  =@nhaft
     @) ent (_     'Ent
     @) entlich    @ntl%IC
    @m) ent (_     'Ent
    @m) ente (_    'Ent@
     @) e (pt_     'E
     @) er (C      3
     @) e (rr      E
     @) e (rti     E
     @) e (rnC     E
     @) er (_S2    @r
     &) ere (_S3   @r@
     &) erem (_S4  @r@m
     &) eren (_S4  @r@n
     &) erer (_S4  @r3
     &) eres (_S4  @r@s
        er (d_     e:r
     &) er (r_     E
        er (g     Er
        erg  (_ Erg
        erk (_     Erk
     &) erin (_    @rIn
     &) erisch (_  @rIS
   exp) er (t      Er
     @) es (_S2    @s
     &) et (_S2    @t
     &) est (_S3   @st
     &) este (_S4  @st@
     &) estem (_S5 @st@m
     &) esten (_S5 @st@n
     &) ester (_S5 @st3
     &) estes (_S5 @st@s

     &) en (@      E2n       // [E2] can reduce to [@]
  //      &) er (C@       E2r
     &) el (@      E2l
     m) e (nt      E

     @) ei (_      'aI
    rl) ei (_      aI
   &fr) ei (_      ,aI
    @@) erisch     @rIS
     &) erung (_   =@rUN
